Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-520
Authorized personnel; administer and manage wildlife resources.

Nothing in sections 37-516 to 37-519 shall prohibit authorized personnel of the commission or the United States Department of the Interior in the administration and management of wildlife resources.

Laws 1978, LB 828, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 274, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-532;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 240.